da: Samling påkrævet for rejsespinderok: Fuld samling påkrævet; Minimal opsætning (kun udklapning/låsning); Ingen samling (klar til at spinde); Noget samling (tilføj komponenter); Andet
vi: Cần có bộ phận máy kéo sợi di động: Cần lắp ráp hoàn chỉnh; Thiết lập cơ bản (chỉ mở/khóa); Không cần lắp ráp (sẵn sàng sử dụng); Lắp ráp một phần (gắn các bộ phận); Khác
es: Montaje requerido de la rueca de viaje: Requiere ensamblaje completo; Configuración mínima (solo desplegar/bloquear); Sin ensamblaje (listo para usar); Requiere algo de ensamblaje (conectar componentes); Otro
sv: Monteringskrav för rese-spinnrock: Kräver fullständig montering; Minimal montering (fälls endast upp/låses); Ingen montering (redo att spinna); Viss montering (fäst komponenter); Övrigt
zh-CN: 旅行纺车是否需要组装: 需要完全组装; 最少设置（仅展开/锁定）; 无需组装（即可使用）; 部分组装（附加组件）; 其他
ko: 여행용 물레 조립 필요 여부: 전체 조립 필요; 최소 설정(펼치기/잠금만); 조립 필요 없음(즉시 사용 가능); 일부 조립(부품 부착); 기타
zh-TW: 旅行紡車需要組裝: 需完全組裝; 最低限度設定 (僅展開/鎖定); 無需組裝 (隨時可紡); 需部分組裝 (安裝組件); 其他
bg-BG: Изисква ли се сглобяване на вретенарското колело (чекрък) за пътуване преди употреба.: Изисква се пълно сглобяване; Минимална настройка (само разгъване/заключване); Без сглобяване (готов за предене); Частично сглобяване (прикрепяне на компоненти); Друго
nb: Reisehjulmontering kreves: Krever full montering; Minimalt oppsett (kun brett ut / lås); Ingen montering (klar til å spinnes); Noe montering (fest komponenter); Annet
cs: Nutnost sestavení cestovního kolovrátku: Vyžaduje kompletní sestavení; Minimální nastavení (pouze rozložení/zajištění); Nevyžaduje sestavení (připraveno k předení); Částečné sestavení (připojení součástí); Jiné
ro-RO: Necesită asamblarea roții de tors de călătorie: Necesită asamblare completă; Configurare minimă (doar depliere/blocare); Fără asamblare (gata de utilizat); Asamblare parțială (atașare componente); Altele
pt-PT: Montagem necessária da roda giratória móvel: Requer montagem completa; Configuração mínima (apenas desdobrar/bloquear); Sem montagem (pronto a fiar); Alguma montagem (fixar componentes); Outro
th: ต้องประกอบเครื่องปั่นด้ายสำหรับเดินทาง: ต้องประกอบเองทั้งหมด; การตั้งค่าน้อยที่สุด (กางออก/ล็อกเท่านั้น); ไม่ต้องประกอบ (พร้อมปั่น); ต้องประกอบบางส่วน (ติดชิ้นส่วน); อื่นๆ
nl: Reisspinnewiel montage vereist: Volledige montage vereist; Minimale installatie (alleen uitvouwen/vergrendelen); Geen montage (klaar voor gebruik); Enige montage (componenten bevestigen); Overig
hu: Forgókerék-összeszerelés szükséges: Teljes összeszerelés szükséges; Minimális beállítás (csak kinyitás/rögzítés); Nem igényel összeszerelést (fonásra kész); Részleges összeszerelés (alkatrészek csatlakoztatása); Egyéb
de: Montageaufwand des Reise-Spinnrads: Vollständige Montage erforderlich; Minimales Setup (nur aufklappen/verriegeln); Keine Montage (sofort einsatzbereit); Teilweise Montage (Komponenten anbringen); Sonstige
it: Necessità di montaggio della ruota di filatura da viaggio: Montaggio completo richiesto; Montaggio minimo (solo apertura/bloccaggio); Nessun montaggio (pronta per l’uso); Parzialmente da montare (fissaggio componenti); Altro
hr-HR: Potrebna je montaža putnog kolovrata: Potrebno je potpuno sastavljanje; Minimalno postavljanje (samo rasklapanje/zaključavanje); Bez sastavljanja (spremno za upotrebu); Djelomično sastavljanje (pričvršćivanje komponenti); Ostalo
fi: Matkarukki, joka edellyttää kokoamista: Vaatii täyden kokoamisen; Minimaalinen asennus (vain taitto/lukitus); Ei vaadi kokoamista (valmis kehräämään); Vaatii hieman kokoamista (osien kiinnitys); Muu
ru: Требование сборки дорожной прялки: Требуется полная сборка; Минимальная сборка (только разложить/зафиксировать); Сборка не требуется (готово к работе); Частичная сборка (присоединение деталей); Другое
el: Απαιτείται συναρμολόγηση τροχού γνεσίματος ταξιδιού: Απαιτείται πλήρης συναρμολόγηση; Ελάχιστη ρύθμιση (μόνο ξεδίπλωμα/ασφάλιση); Καμία συναρμολόγηση (έτοιμο για χρήση); Μερική συναρμολόγηση (προσάρτηση εξαρτημάτων); Άλλο
lt-LT: Reikalingas važiavimo besisukančio rato surinkimas: Reikalingas visiškas surinkimas; Minimalus paruošimas (tik išskleisti / užfiksuoti); Nereikia surinkti (paruošta verpimui); Dalinis surinkimas (pritvirtinti komponentus); Kita
tr: Seyahat tipi çıkrık montaj gereksinimi: Tam kurulum gerektirir; Minimum kurulum (sadece açma/kilitleme); Kurulum gerektirmez (kullanıma hazır); Kısmi kurulum (parçaları takma); Diğer
pl: Wymagany montaż turystycznego kołowrotka przędzalniczego: Wymagany pełny montaż; Minimalny montaż (tylko rozłożenie/zablokowanie); Bez montażu (gotowe do przędzenia); Wymaga częściowego montażu (dołączenie elementów); Inne
ja: 旅行用紡績機組み立て要否: 全面組み立てが必要; 最小限のセットアップ (展開 / ロックのみ); 組み立て不要 (すぐに使える); 一部組み立てが必要 (部品の取り付け); その他
sl-SI: Zahtevano sestavljanje potovalnega kolovrata: Zahtevana je popolna sestava; Minimalna postavitev (samo razklop/zaklep); Sestavljanje ni potrebno (pripravljeno na prejo); Delna sestava (pritrditev komponent); Drugo
fr: Assemblage requis du rouet de voyage: Assemblage complet requis; Configuration minimale (déplier/verrouiller uniquement); Aucun assemblage (prêt à filer); Assemblage partiel (fixer les composants); Autre
sk-SK: Je potrebná montáž cestovného kolovratu: Vyžaduje sa kompletná montáž; Minimálne nastavenie (len rozloženie/uzamknutie); Bez montáže (pripravené na pradenie); Čiastočná montáž (pripojenie komponentov); Iné
pt-BR: Roda de fiar portátil montagem necessária: Requer montagem completa; Configuração mínima (apenas desdobrar/travar); Nenhuma montagem (pronta para girar); Requer alguma montagem (encaixar os componentes); Outro
en: Travel spinning wheel assembly required: Full assembly required; Minimal setup (unfold/lock only); No assembly (ready to spin); Some assembly (attach components); Other